Utah statutes.
26-10b-105.   Report on implementation.

The department shall report to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee by November 1, 1994, and every year thereafter on the implementation of the grant program for primary care services. The report shall include a description of the scope and level of coverage provided to low-income persons by primary care grant programs.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 340, 2010 General Session

